North Carolina statutes. Chapter 159. Local Government Finance.
Part 1. Budgets.

§ 159-7.
Short title; definitions; local acts superseded.

This Article may be cited as “The Local Government Budget and Fiscal Control Act.”

The words and phrases defined in this section have the meanings indicated when used in this Article, unless the context clearly requires another meaning.

“Budget” is a proposed plan for raising and spending money for specified programs, functions, activities or objectives during a fiscal year.

“Budget ordinance” is the ordinance that levies taxes and appropriates revenues for specified purposes, functions, activities, or objectives during a fiscal year.

“Budget year” is the fiscal year for which a budget is proposed or a budget ordinance is adopted.

“Debt service” is the sum of money required to pay installments of principal and interest on bonds, notes, and other evidences of debt accruing within a fiscal year, to maintain sinking funds, and to pay installments on debt instruments issued pursuant to Article 7A of this Chapter or Chapter 159G of the General Statutes accruing within a fiscal year.

, (6) Repealed by Session Laws 1975, c. 514, s. 2.

(7)

“Fiscal year” is the annual period for the compilation of fiscal operations, as prescribed in G.S. 159-8(b).

(8)

“Fund” is a fiscal and accounting entity with a self-balancing set of accounts recording cash and other resources, together with all related liabilities and residual equities or balances, and changes therein, for the purpose of carrying on specific activities or attaining certain objectives in accordance with special regulations, restrictions, or limitations.

(9)

Repealed by Session Laws 1975, c. 514, s. 2.

(10)

“Public authority” is a municipal corporation (other than a unit of local government) that is not subject to the State Budget Act (Chapter 143C of the General Statutes) or a local governmental authority, board, commission, council, or agency that (i) is not a municipal corporation, (ii) is not subject to the State Budget Act, and (iii) operates on an area, regional, or multi-unit basis, and the budgeting and accounting systems of which are not fully a part of the budgeting and accounting systems of a unit of local government.

(11)

Repealed by Session Laws 1975, c. 514, s. 2.

(12)

“Sinking fund” means a fund held for the retirement of term bonds.

(13)

“Special district” is a unit of local government (other than a county, city, town, or incorporated village) that is created for the performance of limited governmental functions or for the operation of a particular utility or public service enterprises.

(14)

“Taxes” do not include special assessments.

(15)

“Unit,” “unit of local government,” or “local government” is a municipal corporation that is not subject to the State Budget Act (Chapter 143C of the General Statutes) and that has the power to levy taxes, including a consolidated city-county, as defined by

G.S. 160B-2(1)

, and all boards, agencies, commissions, authorities, and institutions thereof that are not municipal corporations.

(16)

“Vending facilities” has the same meaning as it does in

G.S. 111-42(d)

, but also means any mechanical or electronic device dispensing items or something of value or entertainment or services for a fee, regardless of the method of activation, and regardless of the means of payment, whether by coin, currency, tokens, or other means.

It is the intent of the General Assembly by enactment of this Article to prescribe for local governments and public authorities a uniform system of budget adoption and administration and fiscal control. To this end and except as otherwise provided in this Article, all provisions of general laws, city charters, and local acts in effect as of July 1, 1973 and in conflict with the provisions of Part 1 or Part 3 of this Article are repealed. No general law, city charter, or local act enacted or taking effect after July 1, 1973, may be construed to modify, amend, or repeal any portion of Part 1 or Part 3 of this Article unless it expressly so provides by specific reference to the appropriate section.

Except as expressly provided herein, this Article does not apply to school administrative units. The adoption and administration of budgets for the public school system and the management of the fiscal affairs of school administrative units are governed by the School Budget and Fiscal Control Act, Chapter 115, Article 9. However, this Article and the School Budget and Fiscal Control Act shall be construed together to the end that the administration of the fiscal affairs of counties and school administrative units may be most effectively and efficiently administered.

History.

1927, c. 146, ss. 1, 2; 1955, c. 724; 1971, c. 780, s. 1; 1973, c. 474, ss. 3, 4; 1975, c. 437, s. 12; c. 514, s. 2; 1981, c. 685, s. 1; 1983 (Reg. Sess., 1984), c. 1034, s. 173; 1987, c. 282, ss. 30, 31; c. 796, s. 3(1); 1989, c. 756, s. 3; 1995, c. 461, s. 9; 2006-203, s. 125; 2020-3, s. 4.30(d).

Local Modification.

Scotland: 1979, c. 187; (As to Article 3) city of Northwest: 1993, c. 222, s. 3 (fiscal year 1993-94); (As to Article 3) town of Archer Lodge: 2009-466, s. 2; town of Arlington: 2001-16, s. 6(b) (for fiscal year 2001-2002); (As to Article 3 for fiscal year 2007-2008 only) town of Butner: 2007-269, s. 1.1; (As to Article 3 for fiscal year 2011-2012 only) town of Castle Hayne: 2011-166 (effective upon certification of election results as to incorporation); (As to Article 3) town of Cedar Point: 1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 1005; town of Dobbins Heights: 1983, c. 658; town of Duck: 2001-394, s. 1 (for fiscal years 2001-2002, 2002-2003); (As to Art. 3) town of Eastover: 2007-267, s. 1 (for fiscal year 2007-2008 and contingent on preclearance under s. 5 of the Voting Rights Act); (As to Article 3) town of Fairview: 2001-428, s. 2 (for fiscal year 2001-2002); (As to Article 3 for fiscal year 2011-2012 only) town of Fontana Dam, 2011-110, s. 1; town of Hampstead: 2007-329, s. 1 (for fiscal year 2007-2008); town of Jonesville: 2001-16, s. 6(b) (for fiscal year 2001-2002); town of Leland: 1989, c. 564, s. 3; town of Lewisville: (As to Article 3) 1991, c. 116 s. 1; town of Midland: 2000-91, s. 2 (for fiscal year 2000-01); (As to Article 3) town of Midway: 2006-37, s. 1; (As to Article 3) town of Millers Creek: 2001-45, s. 2 (for fiscal year 2000-2001); town of Mineral Springs: 1999-175, s. 1 (for fiscal years 1998-1999 and 1999-2000); town of Red Cross: 2002-56, s. 2 (for fiscal years 2001-2003); (As to Article 3) town of Rimertown: 1999-284, s. 2; (As to Article 3 for fiscal year 2011-2012 only) town of Rougemont: 2011-114, s. 1 (effective upon certification of election results as to incorporation); (As to Articles 3 and 19) town of St. James: 1999-241, s. 1; (As to Article 3) town of Sandy Creek: 1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 1007, s. 3; (As to Article 3) town of Sandyfield: 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 729, s. 3 (for fiscal year 1994-95); (As to Article 3) town of Santeetlah: 1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 1012; (As to Article 3) town of Sawmills: 1987, c. 648; (As to Article 3) town of Spencer Mountain: 2015-45, s. 2(a) (expires June 30, 2019); town of Stokesdale: 1989, c. 488 s. 2; (As to Article 3) town of Swannanoa: 2009-467, s. 1; town of Whisett (As to Article 3): 1991, c. 684; (As to Article 3) village of Marvin: 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 641, s. 2; (As to Article 3) village of Sneads Ferry: 2009-431, s. 1; (As to Article 3) village of St. Helena: 1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 942, s. 2; (As to Part 1 of Article 3) village of Wesley Chapel: 1998-43, s. 2 (for fiscal year 1998-99).

Cross References.

As to the Local Government Fiscal Information Act, see

G.S. 120-30.41

et seq.

§ 159-8.
Annual balanced budget ordinance.

Each local government and public authority shall operate under an annual balanced budget ordinance adopted and administered in accordance with this Article. A budget ordinance is balanced when the sum of estimated net revenues and appropriated fund balances is equal to appropriations. Appropriated fund balance in any fund shall not exceed the sum of cash and investments minus the sum of liabilities, encumbrances, and deferred revenues arising from cash receipts, as those figures stand at the close of the fiscal year next preceding the budget year. It is the intent of this Article that, except for moneys expended pursuant to a project ordinance or accounted for in an intragovernmental service fund or a trust and custodial fund excluded from the budget ordinance under G.S. 159-13(a), all moneys received and expended by a local government or public authority should be included in the budget ordinance. Therefore, notwithstanding any other provision of law, no local government or public authority may expend any moneys, regardless of their source (including moneys derived from bond proceeds, federal, state, or private grants or loans, or special assessments), except in accordance with a budget ordinance or project ordinance adopted under this Article or through an intragovernmental service fund or trust and custodial fund properly excluded from the budget ordinance.

The budget ordinance of a unit of local government shall cover a fiscal year beginning July 1 and ending June 30. The budget ordinance of a public authority shall cover a fiscal year beginning July 1 and ending June 30, except that the Local Government Commission, if it determines that a different fiscal year would facilitate the authority’s financial operations, may enter an order permitting an authority to operate under a fiscal year other than from July 1 to June 30. If the Commission does permit an authority to operate under an altered fiscal year, the Commission’s order shall also modify the budget calendar set forth in

G.S. 159-10

through 159-13 so as to provide a new budget calendar for the altered fiscal year that will clearly enable the authority to comply with the intent of this Part.

History.

1971, c. 780, s. 1; 1973, c. 474, s. 5; 1975, c. 514, s. 3; 1979, c. 402, s. 1; 1981, c. 685, s. 2; 2021-60, s. 3.1.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2021-60, s. 3.1, effective July 1, 2021, substituted “custodial fund” for “agency fund” twice in subsection (a).

§ 159-9.
Budget officer.

Each local government and public authority shall appoint a budget officer to serve at the will of the governing board. In counties or cities having the manager form of government, the county or city manager shall be the budget officer. Counties not having the manager form of government may impose the duties of budget officer upon the county finance officer or any other county officer or employee except the sheriff, or in counties having a population of more than 7,500, the register of deeds. Cities not having the manager form of government may impose the duties of budget officer on any city officer or employee, including the mayor if he agrees to undertake them. A public authority or special district may impose the duties of budget officer on the chairman or any member of its governing board or any other officer or employee.

History.

1971, c. 780, s. 1; 1973, c. 474, s. 6.

§ 159-10.
Budget requests.

Before April 30 of each fiscal year (or an earlier date fixed by the budget officer), each department head shall transmit to the budget officer the budget requests and revenue estimates for his department for the budget year. The budget request shall be an estimate of the financial requirements of the department for the budget year, and shall be made in such form and detail, with such supporting information and justifications, as the budget officer may prescribe. The revenue estimate shall be an estimate of all revenues to be realized by department operations during the budget year. At the same time, the finance officer or department heads shall transmit to the budget officer a complete statement of the amount expended for each category of expenditure in the budget ordinance of the immediately preceding fiscal year, a complete statement of the amount estimated to be expended for each category of expenditure in the current year’s budget ordinance by the end of the current fiscal year, the amount realized from each source of revenue during the immediately preceding fiscal year, and the amount estimated to be realized from each source of revenue by the end of the current fiscal year, and such other information and data on the fiscal operations of the local government or public authority as the budget officer may request.

History.

1927, c. 146, s. 5; 1955, cc. 698, 724; 1971, c. 780, s. 1.

§ 159-11.
Preparation and submission of budget and budget message.

Upon receipt of the budget requests and revenue estimates and the financial information supplied by the finance officer and department heads, the budget officer shall prepare a budget for consideration by the governing board in such form and detail as may have been prescribed by the budget officer or the governing board. The budget shall comply in all respects with the limitations imposed by G.S. 159-13(b), and unless the governing board shall have authorized or requested submission of an unbalanced budget as provided in subsection (c) of this section, the budget shall be balanced.

The budget, together with a budget message, shall be submitted to the governing board not later than June 1. The budget and budget message should, but need not, be submitted at a formal meeting of the board. The budget message should contain a concise explanation of the governmental goals fixed by the budget for the budget year, should explain important features of the activities anticipated in the budget, should set forth the reasons for stated changes from the previous year in program goals, programs, and appropriation levels, and should explain any major changes in fiscal policy.

The governing board may authorize or request the budget officer to submit a budget containing recommended appropriations in excess of estimated revenues. If this is done, the budget officer shall present the appropriations recommendations in a manner that will reveal for the governing board the nature of the activities supported by the expenditures that exceed estimated revenues.

The budget officer shall include in the budget a proposed financial plan for each intragovernmental service fund, as required by

G.S. 159-13.1

, and information concerning capital projects and grant projects authorized or to be authorized by project ordinances, as required by

G.S. 159-13.2

.

In each year in which a general reappraisal of real property has been conducted, the budget officer shall include in the budget, for comparison purposes, a statement of the revenue-neutral property tax rate for the budget. The revenue-neutral property tax rate is the rate that is estimated to produce revenue for the next fiscal year equal to the revenue that would have been produced for the next fiscal year by the current tax rate if no reappraisal had occurred. To calculate the revenue-neutral tax rate, the budget officer shall first determine a rate that would produce revenues equal to those produced for the current fiscal year and then increase the rate by a growth factor equal to the average annual percentage increase in the tax base due to improvements since the last general reappraisal. This growth factor represents the expected percentage increase in the value of the tax base due to improvements during the next fiscal year. The budget officer shall further adjust the rate to account for any annexation, deannexation, merger, or similar event.

History.

1927, c. 146, s. 6; 1955, cc. 698, 724; 1969, c. 976, s. 1; 1971, c. 780, s. 1; 1975, c. 514, s. 4; 1979, c. 402, s. 2; 2003-264, s. 1.

§ 159-12.
Filing and publication of the budget; budget hearings.

On the same day that he submits the budget to the governing board, the budget officer shall file a copy of it in the office of the clerk to the board where it shall remain available for public inspection until the budget ordinance is adopted. The clerk shall make a copy of the budget available to all news media in the county. He shall also publish a statement that the budget has been submitted to the governing board, and is available for public inspection in the office of the clerk to the board. The statement shall also give notice of the time and place of the budget hearing required by subsection (b) of this section.

Before adopting the budget ordinance, the board shall hold a public hearing at which time any persons who wish to be heard on the budget may appear.

History.

1927, c. 146, s. 7; 1955, cc. 698, 724; 1971, c. 780, s. 1; 2020-3, s. 4.27(a).

§ 159-13.
The budget ordinance; form, adoption, limitations, tax levy, filing.

Not earlier than 10 days after the day the budget is presented to the board and not later than July 1, the governing board shall adopt a budget ordinance making appropriations and levying taxes for the budget year in such sums as the board may consider sufficient and proper, whether greater or less than the sums recommended in the budget. The budget ordinance shall authorize all financial transactions of the local government or public authority except the following:

Those authorized by a project ordinance,

Those accounted for in an intragovernmental service fund for which a financial plan is prepared and approved, and

Those accounted for in a trust or custodial fund established to account for moneys held by the local government or public authority as an agent or common-law trustee or to account for a retirement, pension, or similar employee benefit system.

Representative payee funds received under the Social Security Agency Representative Payee Program. These restricted funds belong to and are used for the support of minor children and certain adults.

The budget ordinance may be in any form that the board considers most efficient in enabling it to make the fiscal policy decisions embodied therein, but it shall make appropriations by department, function, or project and show revenues by major source.

The following directions and limitations shall bind the governing board in adopting the budget ordinance:

The full amount estimated by the finance officer to be required for debt service during the budget year shall be appropriated.

The full amount of any deficit in each fund shall be appropriated.

A contingency appropriation shall not exceed five percent (5%) of the total of all other appropriations in the same fund, except there is no limit on contingency appropriations for public assistance programs required by Chapter 108A. Each expenditure to be charged against a contingency appropriation shall be authorized by resolution of the governing board, which resolution shall be deemed an amendment to the budget ordinance setting up an appropriation for the object of expenditure authorized. The governing board may authorize the budget officer to authorize expenditures from contingency appropriations subject to such limitations and procedures as it may prescribe. Any such expenditures shall be reported to the board at its next regular meeting and recorded in the minutes.

No appropriation may be made that would require the levy of a tax in excess of any constitutional or statutory limitation, or expenditures of revenues for purposes not permitted by law.

The total of all appropriations for purposes which require voter approval for expenditure of property tax funds under Article V, Sec. 2(5), of the Constitution shall not exceed the total of all estimated revenues other than the property tax (not including such revenues required by law to be spent for specific purposes) and property taxes levied for such purposes pursuant to a vote of the people.

The estimated percentage of collection of property taxes shall not be greater than the percentage of the levy actually realized in cash as of June 30 during the preceding fiscal year. For purposes of the calculation under this subdivision only, the levy for the registered motor vehicle tax under Article 22A of Chapter 105 of the General Statutes shall be based on the nine-month period ending March 31 of the preceding fiscal year, and the collections realized in cash with respect to this levy shall be based on the 12-month period ending June 30 of the preceding fiscal year.

Estimated revenues shall include only those revenues reasonably expected to be realized in the budget year, including amounts to be realized from collections of taxes levied in prior fiscal years.

Repealed by Session Laws 1975, c. 514, s. 6.

Appropriations made to a school administrative unit by a county may not be reduced after the budget ordinance is adopted, unless the board of education of the administrative unit agrees by resolution to a reduction, or unless a general reduction in county expenditures is required because of prevailing economic conditions. Before a board of county commissioners may reduce appropriations to a school administrative unit as part of a general reduction in county expenditures required because of prevailing economic conditions, it must do all of the following:

Hold a public meeting at which the school board is given an opportunity to present information on the impact of the reduction.

Take a public vote on the decision to reduce appropriations to a school administrative unit.

Appropriations made to another fund from a fund established to account for property taxes levied pursuant to a vote of the people may not exceed the amount of revenues other than the property tax available to the fund, except for appropriations from such a fund to an appropriate account in a capital reserve fund.

Repealed by Session Laws 1975, c. 514, s. 6.

Repealed by Session Laws 1981, c. 685, s. 4.

No appropriation of the proceeds of a bond issue may be made from the capital project fund account established to account for the proceeds of the bond issue except (i) for the purpose for which the bonds were issued, (ii) to the appropriate debt service fund, or (iii) to an account within a capital reserve fund consistent with the purposes for which the bonds were issued. The total of other appropriations made to another fund from such a capital project fund account may not exceed the amount of revenues other than bond proceeds available to the account.

No appropriation may be made from a utility or public service enterprise fund to any other fund than the appropriate debt service fund unless the total of all other appropriations in the fund equal or exceed the amount that will be required during the fiscal year, as shown by the budget ordinance, to meet operating expenses, capital outlay, and debt service on outstanding utility or enterprise bonds or notes. A county may, upon a finding that a fund balance in a utility or public service enterprise fund used for operation of a landfill exceeds the requirements for funding the operation of that fund, including closure and post-closure expenditures, transfer excess funds accruing due to imposition of a surcharge imposed on another local government located within the State for use of the disposal facility, as authorized by G.S. 153A-292(b), to support the other services supported by the county’s general fund.

Sufficient funds to meet the amounts to be paid during the fiscal year under continuing contracts previously entered into shall be appropriated unless such contract reserves to the governing board the right to limit or not to make such appropriation.

The sum of estimated net revenues and appropriated fund balance in each fund shall be equal to appropriations in that fund. Appropriated fund balance in a fund shall not exceed the sum of cash and investments minus the sum of liabilities, encumbrances, and deferred revenues arising from cash receipts, as those figures stand at the close of the fiscal year next preceding the budget year.

No appropriations may be made from a county reappraisal reserve fund except for the purposes for which the fund was established.

No appropriation may be made from a service district fund to any other fund except (i) to the appropriate debt service fund or (ii) to an appropriate account in a capital reserve fund unless the district has been abolished.

No appropriation of the proceeds of a debt instrument may be made from the capital project fund account established to account for such proceeds except for the purpose for which such debt instrument was issued. The total of other appropriations made to another fund from such a capital project fund account may not exceed the amount of revenues other than debt instrument proceeds available to the account.Notwithstanding subdivisions (9), (10), (12), (14), (17), or (18) of this subsection, any fund may contain an appropriation to another fund to cover the cost of (i) levying and collecting the taxes and other revenues allocated to the fund, and (ii) building maintenance and other general overhead and administrative expenses properly allocable to functions or activities financed from the fund.

The budget ordinance of a local government shall levy taxes on property at rates that will produce the revenue necessary to balance appropriations and revenues, after taking into account the estimated percentage of the levy that will not be collected during the fiscal year. The budget ordinance of a public authority shall be balanced so that appropriations do not exceed revenues.

The budget ordinance shall be entered in the minutes of the governing board and within five days after adoption copies thereof shall be filed with the finance officer, the budget officer, and the clerk to the governing board.

History.

1927, c. 146, s. 8; 1955, cc. 698, 724; 1969, c. 976, s. 2; 1971, c. 780, s. 1; 1973, c. 474, ss. 7-9; c. 489, s. 3; 1975, c. 437, ss. 13, 14; c. 514, ss. 5, 6; 1981, c. 685, ss. 3-5, 10; 1987, c. 796, s. 3(2); 1989, c. 756, s. 2; 1999-261, s. 1; 2000-140, s. 80; 2002-126, s. 6.7(a); 2013-413, s. 59.4(b); 2021-60, s. 3.2.

§ 159-13.1.
Financial plan for intragovernmental service funds.

If a local government or public authority establishes and operates one or more intragovernmental service funds, it need not include such a fund in its budget ordinance. However, at the same time it adopts the budget ordinance, the governing board shall approve a balanced financial plan for each intragovernmental service fund. A financial plan is balanced when estimated expenditures do not exceed estimated revenues.

The budget officer shall include in the budget he submits to the board, pursuant to

G.S. 159-11

, a proposed financial plan for each intragovernmental service fund to be operated during the budget year by the local government or public authority. The proposed financial plan shall be in such form and detail as prescribed by the budget officer or governing board.

The approved financial plan shall be entered in the minutes of the governing board, as shall each amendment to the plan approved by the board. Within five days after approval, copies of the plan and copies of each amendment thereto shall be filed with the finance officer, the budget officer, and the clerk to the governing board.

Any change in a financial plan must be approved by the governing board.

History.

1975, c. 514, s. 7.

§ 159-13.2.
Project ordinances.

Definitions. —

In this section “capital project” means a project financed in whole or in part by the proceeds of bonds or notes or debt instruments or a project involving the construction or acquisition of a capital asset.

“Grant project” means a project financed in whole or in part by revenues received from the federal and/or State government for operating or capital purposes as defined by the grant contract.

Alternative Budget Methods. — A local government or public authority may, in its discretion, authorize and budget for a capital project or a grant project either in its annual budget ordinance or in a project ordinance adopted pursuant to this section. A project ordinance authorizes all appropriations necessary for the completion of the project and neither it nor any part of it need be readopted in any subsequent fiscal year. Neither a bond order nor an order authorizing any debt instrument constitutes a project ordinance.

Adoption of Project Ordinances. — If a local government or public authority intends to authorize a capital project or a grant project by a project ordinance, it shall not begin the project until it has adopted a balanced project ordinance for the life of the project. A project ordinance is balanced when revenues estimated to be available for the project equal appropriations for the project. A project ordinance shall clearly identify the project and authorize its undertaking, identify the revenues that will finance the project, and make the appropriations necessary to complete the project.

Project Ordinance Filed. — Each project ordinance shall be entered in the minutes of the governing board. Within five days after adoption, copies of the ordinance shall be filed with the finance officer, the budget officer, and the clerk to the governing board.

Amendment. — A project ordinance may be amended in any manner so long as it continues to fulfill all requirements of this section.

Inclusion of Project Information in Budget. — Each year the budget officer shall include in the budget information in such detail as he or the governing board may require concerning each grant project or capital project (i) expected to be authorized by project ordinance during the budget year and (ii) authorized by previously adopted project ordinances which will have appropriations available for expenditure during the budget year.

History.

1975, c. 514, s. 8; 1979, c. 402, s. 3; 1987, c. 796, s. 3(3), 3(4).

§ 159-14.
Trust and custodial funds; budgets of special districts.

Budgets of Special Districts. — If the tax-levying power of a special district is by law exercised on its behalf by a county or city, and if the county or city governing board is vested by law with discretion as to what rate of tax it will levy on behalf of the special district, the governing board of the special district shall transmit to the governing board of the county or city on or before June 1 a request to levy taxes on its behalf for the budget year at a stated rate. The county or city governing board shall then determine what rate of tax it will approve, and shall so notify the district governing board not later than June 15. Failure of the county or city governing board to act on the district’s request on or before June 15 and to so notify the district governing board by that date shall be deemed approval of the full rate requested by the district governing board. Upon receiving notification from the county or city governing board as to what rate of tax will be approved or after June 15 if no such notification is received, the district governing board shall complete its budget deliberations and shall adopt its budget ordinance.If the tax-levying power of a special district is by law exercised on its behalf by a county or city, and if the county or city governing board has no discretion as to what rate of tax it will levy on behalf of the special district, the governing board of the district shall notify the city or county by June 15 of the rate of tax it wishes to have levied. If the district does not notify the county or city governing board on or before June 15 of the rate of tax it wishes to have levied, the county or city is not required to levy a tax for the district for the fiscal year.If the taxes of a special district are collected on its behalf by a county or city, and if the county or city governing board has no power to approve the district tax levy, the district governing board shall adopt its budget ordinance not later than July 1 and on or before July 15 shall notify the county or city collecting its taxes of the rate of tax it has levied. If the district does not notify the county or city governing board on or before July 15 of the rate of tax it has levied, the county or city is not required to collect the district’s taxes for the fiscal year.

Transfers from Certain Trust and Custodial Funds. — Except for transfers to the appropriate special district or public authority, a unit of local government may not transfer moneys from a fund established to account for taxes collected on behalf of a special district or from a fund established to account for special assessments collected on behalf of a public authority unless the special district or public authority has ceased to function.

History.

1971, c. 780, s. 1; 1973, c. 474, ss. 10, 11; 1975, c. 514, s. 9; 2021-60, s. 3.3.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2021-60, s. 3.3, effective July 1, 2021, substituted “custodial funds” for “agency funds” in the section heading; and substituted “Custodial Funds” for “Agency Funds” in subsection (b).

§ 159-15.
Amendments to the budget ordinance.

Except as otherwise restricted by law, the governing board may amend the budget ordinance at any time after the ordinance’s adoption in any manner, so long as the ordinance, as amended, continues to satisfy the requirements of

G.S. 159-8

and 159-13. However, except as otherwise provided in this section, no amendment may increase or reduce a property tax levy or in any manner alter a property taxpayer’s liability, unless the board is ordered to do so by a court of competent jurisdiction, or by a State agency having the power to compel the levy of taxes by the board.

If after July 1 the local government receives revenues that are substantially more or less than the amount anticipated, the governing body may, before January 1 following adoption of the budget, amend the budget ordinance to reduce or increase the property tax levy to account for the unanticipated increase or reduction in revenues.

The governing board by appropriate resolution or ordinance may authorize the budget officer to transfer moneys from one appropriation to another within the same fund subject to such limitations and procedures as it may prescribe. Any such transfers shall be reported to the governing board at its next regular meeting and shall be entered in the minutes.

History.

1927, c. 146, s. 13; 1955, cc. 698, 724; 1971, c. 780, s. 1; 1973, c. 474, s. 12; 2001-308, s. 3; 2002-126, s. 30A.2.

§ 159-16.
Interim budget.

In case the adoption of the budget ordinance is delayed until after July 1, the governing board shall make interim appropriations for the purpose of paying salaries, debt service payments, and the usual ordinary expenses of the local government or public authority for the interval between the beginning of the budget year and the adoption of the budget ordinance. Interim appropriations so made shall be charged to the proper appropriations in the budget ordinance.

History.

1927, c. 146, s. 14; 1955, cc. 698, 724; 1971, c. 780, s. 1.

§ 159-17.
Ordinance procedures not applicable to budget or project ordinance adoption.

Notwithstanding the provisions of any city charter, general law, or local act:

Any action with respect to the adoption or amendment of the budget ordinance or any project ordinance may be taken at any regular or special meeting of the governing board by a simple majority of those present and voting, a quorum being present;

No action taken with respect to the adoption or amendment of the budget ordinance or any project ordinance need be published or is subject to any other procedural requirement governing the adoption of ordinances or resolutions by the governing board other than the procedures set out in this Article;

The adoption and amendment of the budget ordinance or any project ordinance and the levy of taxes in the budget ordinance are not subject to the provisions of any city charter or local act concerning initiative or referendum.

During the period beginning with the submission of the budget to the governing board and ending with the adoption of the budget ordinance, the governing board may hold any special meetings that may be necessary to complete its work on the budget ordinance. Except for the notice requirements of

G.S. 143-318.12

, which continue to apply, no provision of law concerning the call of special meetings applies during that period so long as (i) each member of the board has actual notice of each special meeting called for the purpose of considering the budget, and (ii) no business other than consideration of the budget is taken up. This section does not allow the holding of closed meetings or executive sessions by any governing board otherwise prohibited by law from holding such a meeting or session, and may not be construed to do so.

No general law, city charter, or local act enacted or taking effect after July 1, 1973, may be construed to modify, amend, or repeal any portion of this section unless it expressly so provides by specific reference to this section.

History.

1971, c. 780, s. 1; 1973, c. 474, s. 13; 1979, c. 402, ss. 4, 5; c. 655, s. 2.

Local Modification.

Wilmington/New Hanover County Consolidated Government: 1987, c. 643; city of Wilmington: 1983, c. 367.

§ 159-17.1.
Vending facilities.

Moneys received by a public authority, special district, or unit of local government on account of operation of vending facilities shall be deposited, budgeted, appropriated, and expended in accordance with the provisions of this Article.

History.

1983 (Reg. Sess., 1984), c. 1034, s. 174.